Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 20 Decisions, Special Findings and Assessment of Damages

9-20-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 303; G.L. 1909, ch. 288, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 338, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 533, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-20-1

; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 33, effective January 10, 1966. For rules governing findings of fact and conclusions of law, see Super. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 52(a).

9-20-2.
Assessment of damages on default or submission.

In all cases, except where otherwise provided, if judgment is rendered on default, discontinuance, submission, or motion, damages shall be assessed by the court, with the intervention of a jury unless cause is shown why there should be no intervention of a jury. The claimant in any case may waive the intervention of a jury.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 352; G.L. 1909, ch. 291, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 341, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 534, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-20-2

; P.L. 1958, ch. 61, § 2; P.L. 1961, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 34.

9-20-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 353; G.L. 1909, ch. 291, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 341, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 534, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-20-3

; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 33, effective January 10, 1966. For special verdicts in superior court, see Super. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 49(a).

9-20-4.
Comparative negligence.

In all actions hereafter brought for personal injuries, or where personal injuries have resulted in death, or for injury to property, the fact that the person injured, or the owner of the property or person having control over the property, may not have been in the exercise of due care or the fact that the danger or defect was open and obvious shall not bar a recovery, but damages shall be diminished by the finder of fact in proportion to the amount of negligence attributable to the person injured, or the owner of the property or the person having control over the property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 206, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 185, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 256, § 1.

9-20-4.1.
No setoff of damages.

There shall be no setoff of damages between the respective parties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 206, § 1.

9-20-5.
Assumption of risk in use of off-road vehicles.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

9-20-4

, in any legal action against the state or any political subdivision thereof, an operator or passenger of: (1) a recreational vehicle as defined in §

31-3.2-1(8)

or (2) a snowmobile as defined in §

31-3.2-1(11)

, or (3) an all terrain vehicle (A.T.V.), or (4) a motor vehicle primarily designed for use off public roads, shall while on state property assume as a matter of law the risks inherent in such operation insofar as they are obvious and necessary.

The director of the department of environmental management shall post signs warning operators and passengers that they assume the risk of injury while on state property. Provided, however, that the lack of signs shall not be admissible in a suit for negligence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 535, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 71; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 8.